Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.510

Limitation on authority to regulate or establish standards regarding a jail.

Nothing in this chapter or in any provision of law shall be interpreted to invest the commission with the authority to regulate or establish standards regarding a jail as defined in RCW 70.48.020 that does not operate, in whole or in part, a pharmacy or a correctional pharmacy. This section does not limit the commission's authority to regulate a pharmacist that has entered into an agreement with a jail for the provision of pharmaceutical services.

[ 2013 c 19 s 31; 2009 c 411 s 2.]